Utah statutes.
71-7-3.   Development, operation, and maintenance of Utah Veterans' Cemetery and Memorial Park -- Responsibilities of Department of Veterans' Affairs -- Costs -- Definition.

(1)  The Department of Veterans' Affairs, in consultation with the Veterans' Memorial Park Board, shall develop, operate, and maintain a veterans' cemetery and memorial park.

(2)  To help pay the costs of developing, constructing, operating, and maintaining a veterans' cemetery and memorial park, the Department of Veterans' Affairs may:

(a)  by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures, receive federal funds, and may receive state funds, contributions from veterans' organizations, and other private donations; and

(b)  charge fees for at least the cost of the burial of veterans' spouses and other persons, whom the department and the Veterans' Memorial Park Board determines are eligible to be buried in a veterans' cemetery established by the state.

(3)  As used in this chapter, "veteran" has the same meaning as in Section 71-8-1.

